Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202661-229
State flood mitigation plan; report.

The state flood mitigation plan shall be completed and reported to the Governor and electronically to the Legislature on or before July 1, 2022.

Laws 2020, LB632, § 13.